tools/hyphenators/hyph_smj.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
.a2l1l1
.2a1l
.a2n1g1
.a2r1k
.2ar
.a1v2i1
.á2ss1
.b2á1d1
.1bá
.b2á1j
.1ca2
.ce1r1
.1ce
.1c1g1
.cm1
.čj2
.dáb1
.1d2á
.2ds2
.d1t2v1
.2d1t
.e2a2k1
.e1a
.e1k2a1
.e2n1r1
.ep1
.e2s1c2
.e1v2a1
.2ev
.fur1
.1fu
.g2á1d1
.g1g2i
.2g1g
.g2nr1
.2g1n2
.2gs2
.hab1
.1ha
.he1k
.1h2e
.h2us1
.1hu
.ien1
.i2e
.i2ht1
.2ih
.i2i2
.i2n1f1
.2i1n
.jes1
.j2e
.j1iq1
.j2i
.jv1
.k2á1r1
.1ká
.1k1r2a1
.k2r
.k1v2a1
.2k1v
.kør1
.1k1ø
.2l1x1
.ma2k1
.1m2a
.m2a2l
.1n2á1r1
.2n1d2
.ne1g1
.1n2e
.ni1k1
.1n2i
.2n1k2
.2n1t2
.nå1g1
.n2å
.1o2x1i1
.o1x
.p1c1o
.2pc
.p1f2i1
.2p1f2
.2p1p2
.p2ps1
.p1t2a1
.2p1t
.qu1
.2r1d2
.2r2n2
.ro2
.2ro1m1
.r2s2s
.2r1s
.2ss2
.2s1t2
.2s2v2
.t1r2e1
.2t1r2
.2u1g1
.u2l1l1
.2u1l
.2vd2
.2vk1
.vo1l1
.2v1t1
.vå1g1
.1vå
.2yj2
.z2ys1
.æä2g2
.æ2ä
.æä2k2
.æä1l2
.ä2i1n1
.äi1
.å2n2n1
.år1
.å2vd1
a1a1á
a2ac
1a2a1d
1aah
a1a2i
a2a1l
a1a1o
1aa1p
a1a1sa
a1a2u
a1a1w
a1a1x
a1á
ab2at1
a1b2a
1a2bc
ab2i1n1
a1b2i
a2bn2
ab1o2a
a1b2o
ab1r2
2ac
1a2c1c2
a1cd
a2c1h1
a2c1n2
1a2c2r
ac2æ
a1č
a1ç
2a1d
ada1v
a1d2a
a1d2e1
1a2dg
1a2d1h
a2d1j
ad1j2u1
a2dm
a2d2n2
ad2s2j1
a2ds
a2d1y
a2d1ø
a1đ
a1e
a1eb
ae2co
a2ec
aek1
a1é
a1f
1af.
afi1d1
a1f2i
2a1g
a1g2a1
age1s
ag1gu1
a2g1g
1agn2o
a2g1n2
a2g2r
a1ha1
ahel1
a1h2e
a2hk
a1hv2
a2hæ
a2i2a
a1i1b
a1i2c
a2i1d
a1i2e
a1i1f
a1io
a1iq
a1i1s
a1i1t
a1í
a2j1
a1j2a
a1j2á
a1j2e
a1j2i
a1j2i1d1
aj1ki2
a1j1l
a1j2o
a2j2t2
a1j2å
a2k
1a2kb
a2k2e1
akek1
1ake1r1
a2k1f
a1kg
a2k2h
ak2ko
a2k1k
a1k2l2
a2k1o2
1a2k1p2
ak1tu1
a2k1t
ak1us
a1ku
2a1l
2a1la
a2lab
ale1l
a1l2e
a2l2i1n
a1li
al1l2e1
a2l1l
1a2l1q
1al1t2e
a2l1t
1a2l'
2a1m
a2m2a1d
a1m2a
am2b2h
a2m1b2
a2m1k
a2m2o1
a2mw
anah1
a1n2a
a1ná
a2nb2
an2d2a
a2n1d
a1n2e1
an2gs1
a2n1g
a1nj
a1n1j2u
1a2n2n1n
a2n1n
a1n2o
an2sa
a2n1s2
1a2n1t
a1n2u
1a2n`
a2ŋ
a1o
1a2of
1a2o1r
a1ó
a1p
a2p2c
a2p1d2
a2p1f2
a2p1g2
a2po
a2p1p2
a2p1y
a1q
2ar
a1r2a
ara1i
ara1o1
ar2a1t
a2r2á
a2r2e
ar2g2a
a2r1g
ar1i1p
a1r2i
a2r2n2
a1r2o
a2r2r
ar1r2á1
ar2s1s
a2r1s
a2r2v1
a2rå
asa1v
a1sa
a2s2á
as2á1d
as2j1
a2s1l
a2s2m1
as1s2i1
a2ss
2a2s1t
a1s2u
asy1k1
a1sy
a1š2k
2at
2a1t2a
atán1
a1t2á
a2tn1
a2t2s2
at1t2á
a2t1t
a2t1u
a2t2ø
a1þ
a2u
au2a
a1u1d
a2u1g1
a1u2i
a1u1r
a2vg
a1v1h
1avi1t
a1v2i
1a2v1l
a2vo
1a2v'
a1w
a1x
1a2x1i
a2xm2
a1y1a
a1yi
a2y1o
a2y1r
a1z
a1æ
a1ø
aøk2
a1ö
a1å
a1°
á1a
á1á
á1b2a1
á2bn2
á1br2
á1c
á1cd1
2áč
2á1d
á2d1j
á2d2t
á1đ
á1e
2áf
á2fg
á2f2j
2á1g
á2hk
1áh1ká
á2i
á2i1s
á1í
2áj
á2j2a
áj1b
áj2e
áj2i
áj2r2a
áj1r
á2j1s2
1ájv
á1j2æ
ájæ2ä1
á1j2å
ák1
á1k2r
ák1s2e1
á2k1s
ál2a1d1
á1la
á1l2á
1á2l1g
ál1l2o1
á2l1l
álo1k1
á1l2o
á1m
á1m2á1
á1me1
á2m1v
án2a1g1
á1n2a
á1ná
án2áj1
á2nb2
á2nj
1á2n1n
á1n2o
á2n1s2
á1n2u
á1n2æ
á1o
á2p1
á2p1m
áp2o1l1
á1po
1ápp2á
á2p1p
á2pu
á2p1y
2á1r
á2r1d1
áre1l
á1r2e
á2r2n2
á2r1o2a
ár1r2á1
á2r1r
ár1r2e1
á1sa1
ás2im1
á1s2i
á2s2j1
á2s2k
ás1m2á1
á2sm
á1s2u1
1áš
2á1t
á2t2á1
átj2a1
á1t2j
á2t1n
á2t2o
á2t2s2
át2t2e
á2t1t
át2t2i
á2t2v
á2t1å
á1þ
á1u
á2v
á1vb2
á2vg
á1vo
á1v1p
á1x
á1y
á1z
á1æ
á1ø
á1å
âa2
âd2
â2dg1
âe1g1
âe2n1d1
âi1d1
âj2
âl2
âr2
âs2
ât2
âx2
1b2a
2b2a1d
bah1
bai1
ba1li1
b2a1l
ba2s1s
b2a1t2a1
b2at
1bá
b1áb
b2á1d
bá1r2i1
b2á1r
b2á1t
b1á2v
2b1b
b2b2c
b1be1
b2b2l
bbo1t1
b1b2o
2bc
b2cn2
b1č
b1ç
2b1d
b1d2a1
b2d2f2
1be
b1ek1
2b1e1m
be1n
2bé1
b1f2
b1g
1b2h
b1h1æ
bh1ö
1b2i
bi2e2
bi1k1
b1i2l'
bi1l
b1i1p
b1í
2bj
b1j2a
b1jb
b1j2e
b2j1n2
b2j1s2
b1j2u
2bk
b1k2r
bk1æ
2b1l
b2l2á
b1l2e
b2l2k
2b1m
b1m2a1
b2m2b2
b1me1
b1mi1
b2m2o1
b2mt1
b2mw
2bn2
bn2a1d1
b1n2a
b1nj
b1n2o
b2nr1
b1n2u
1b2o
bo2a1d1
bo2a
b1oah
bo2d2æ
bo1d
bo1k1
bo2r1d1
b2o1r
bo2x1
1bô
2b2p
b2p2c
bq1
br2
b2r2á
1b2r2d
b2r2e
b1r2i2
b2r2n2
1bro1
b2r2u1t1
b1r2u
1b1rå
2bs2
b2sa
b2s1t2
2b2t
b1t2o1
b2t2t
b1t1å
1bu
b1u2e
bu1r
b2ü
1b1v2
b1ve1
2b1w
b1x
1b2y1
b1z
1bæ
b1æä2d2
bæ2ä
1bä1
1bø
1b2ö
1bå
b1åd
b1å2k1
b2åv
2b'
2b`
2b´
1ca
2c1ab
c1a2k
c2a1l
2c1á
1c2b2
2c1c2
cc2at
c1ca
c1c1g1
ccm1
c1č
c1ç
1cd
c2d2r2
2c1d2æ
c1d1å
1ce
ce2k1s1
c1ex
2c1f2
cfo1t1
c1fo
cfy1l1
1c1g
c2g2a
c2g1j
cg2o
2c1h
c1h1g1
c2h1l
1ci
cia1a
c2i1a
ci1d1
c1í
2cj
c1k
ck2u1l1
c1ku
c2l
cl1hu1
c2lh2
c1l2i
c2l1s2
c2m1t
1cn2
2cn.
c1n2æ
1co
co1m1
co1s1
c1p
c1q
2c2r
2cs
c2s2e
2c1t
c1t2i1
c2t2j
c1þ
1cu
c1un
cu2p2i
cu1p
1cú
1c1v
2c1ve
c1w
c1w2i1
2c1x
c1y2d1
c1y1k
c1æ
2c2ø
c1ö
2c1å
2c'
2c`
2c´
1ča
č2á
čás1
2č1č
č1d
1če
čet1
če2x
čn2
1čo
čo1k2
čp2
čr2
1čs2
č1å
1d2a
2dab
da2b2o
d2a1c
da2ht1
2da2k1v
da2k
da1r2a1
d2ar
da2r1s1
da2r2u
das1
2d1a1w
1d2á
dá1g2a1
d2á1g
d2á1j1
dá1j1r
dá1li1
2db
d2be
d2b2o1
d2b2p
d1bu1
d1b1æ
dbæ2ä1
d2bå
2dc
d2c2h
d1c2l
2d1č
2d1ç
2d1d
dd2a1t
d1d2a
d2d2á
d1d2e1
d2d2j
d1d2o1
1d2e
d2e1d1
de1l
2de1m
dep1
de1r2i1
de1r
d1é
2df2
df1d1i
d2fd
2dg
d2ga2j1
d1g2a
d1g2o
dg1s2j2
d2gs
2d1h
1di
d2i1a1
d2i1d1
d2i2e
di2l1l1
di1l
di2n1g1
d2i1n
di2n1n1
2d1iq
d1i2r1g
di1s1
di1t2
2d1í
2dj
dj2a1
dj2e1
dje1t1
d1j2i1
d2j1n2
d1j1r
d1j2u
dju1h
d1j2å
1d2k
d1k1i
d2k2k
d1k1o
dk2r1
dk2sa
d2k1s
2dl
d2la
d1l2á
d2l1r
2dm
d2m1e
d1mi1
1dmi1t
2d1n2
dn2e1n
d1n2e
dno1s1
dn2o
dnu1h
dn2u
dnu1s
1d2o
d1o2a
do2a1d1
do2k1
do1me1
do1m
2d1ó
d1ò
2d1p2
2dq
2d2r2
2ds
d2s2f2
d2s2j
ds2j1s2
d2ss2
d2så
d1š
2d1t
1d2u
2d2uj
du2k1t1
d1un
du1r2i1
d2ü
1dv2
d2ve
d1w
2d1x
dxt2
d1y
dy2rk1
dy1r
1d2ys1
d1z
1d2æ
2dø
1då
då1g2a1
då1g
d1å1s
dåt1
2d2'
2d`
2d2´
đa2
đbu1k
đ1bu
đc2
2đ1đ
đe2k1s1
đ1g
đj2
đl2
đm2
đn2
đs2
đt2
đw2
đ1yu1
đån1
e1a
e2a2k1
e2a1l
e1á
1e2b1d
e2b2i
e2bn2
1eb1r2u
ebr2
2ec
e2cn2
e1ç
2ed1
1e2db
e2d1i1t2
e1di
e2d1j
e2d1m
ed1n2a1
e2d1n2
e1d2o
1e2d1t
e2d2æ
ee2a
e1e1g
e1ei
1ee1r
e1et
e1f
e1g
e2g1d
e2g2r
egår1
e1g2å
1e2g2'
e2h2i
e2hk
eh1p2a1
e2hp
e1h1r2
e2h1æ
e2i2a
1e2i1d
e1i2e
e2ih
e1i1k
e1i1p
e1i1s
ei1t1
e1it.
e1í
2ej
e1j2a
ej1d2a1
e2j1d
e1j2e
e1j2p2
e1j2u
e1j2å
e2k1d2
e1k2e1
1e2kg
e1k2l2
e2k2r
ek1t2o1
e2k1t
ek1tu1
e2k1v
e2k1w
e2l2a1d
e1la
el2á
el1e1t
e1l2e
e2l1f
e2l1h2
e2l2i1a
e1li
el1i2e
el1i1k
e2lir
e2l2k
e2l2o
elo1s1
1elv.
e2lv
e2l2å
e1m
1em2ac
e1m2a
em1b2i1
e2m1b2
emi2e1
e1mi
e2m2l
1e2m1r2
e2m2å
en2a1g
e1n2a
ena1s
e2n2e
e2n1ei
en1e1l
enep1
1ene1q
e2nj
e2n2n2
e1n1o1l
en2o
e2n1r
en2r2i
ens2u1
e2n1s2
en2æ
e2ŋ
e1o
e2o1n
1e2o'
e2p1c
e2p1d2
e2p2l
e2po
e2pu
e2p1æ
1e1på
1e2p2´
e1q
e1r
e2r1án
e1r2á
e2rh
eri1s1
e1r2i
er1j2a
e2rj
e2r1k
1e2r2n2
e2r2ø
e2r1ö
e2s2aa
e1sa
e2s2a1l
e2s2á
e2s1d
ese1l
e1s2e
e2sj1k
es2j
es2ká
e2s1k
e2s1l2
1e2sr
1e2š
e1š2k
etj2a1
e1t2j
1et1n2a
e2tn
e2t2o
e2t2s2
et2t2s2
e2t1t
e2t1v2a
e1t2v
1e2t2y
e2tå
1e2t`
1eu1
eu2a
e1u2i
euk1
euro1
e2u1t
2ev
ev2áj
e1v2á
e1vb2
e1w
e1wa
e2x1f2
e2y
1ez
e2æ
e1ä
1eø
e1ö
e1å
é2l
1é2m
é1n
é1o
é1r2
ér2é1
2é1t
é1t2o1
é1u
1é2v
ê1z
1fa
f2ac
fa1f1
fa2k1t1
fa2k
f2an
f2ar1
f2as
fáb1
f1áh
2f2b
f1b1á
fbás1
2f1c
2fd
f2d2a
f2dl1
1f2e
f1ei
f1é
2f1f
ff2as
f1fa
ffek1
f1f2e
2f2f2f
f2f1n2
f2f1s
f2h
1f2i
f1i2e
1f2j
2f2j1d
2f2k2
f2k2j2
2f2l2
flir1
f1li
1f2m2
2f1n2
f2n2a
f2nr1
1fo
fo1b1
fo1n2
f1ó
f1ò
2fp
f2p1p2
1f2r
fr1as
f1r2a
f2r2s
2fs
f2s2n
f2s2r
f2s2t
f2s1æ
f2s1å
2f1t2
1fu
2f1v
1f1w2
f1y1a
f2y1s
2fz
2f2æ
f1ø
føf1
1fö
f1öl2
för1
fån1
får1
f2å1s
2f'
2f`
2f´
1g2a
ga1b
g2a1c
ga2ht1
ga2k
ga2m1p1
g2a1m
ga1n
ga2s2j1
ga2ss1
g2a1t2a1
g2at
g1áh
2gás
gá2t1t1
g2á1t
2g2b
g2b1s2
2gd
g2d2a
ge1b
ge1h
1gej1r
g2ej
ge2n1
g2e1r
ges2j1
ge1t
2g1e2y
2g1f
gf2k1v1
g2f2k2
2g1g
g1g2a1
gge1
gg2o1
ggu1s
g1gu
g2ha
1g2i
gi1d1
gie1n
gi2e
gies1
gij1l2
g2i2j1
g1i1o
g1i2r1d1
g2i2s2j1
gi1s
g1í
2gj
g1j2a
g1j2e
g1j2i
gj2i1a1
gju1m1
gj2u
2g1k
2g2l2
gla1w1
g1la
2g1m
g2m2a
g2mü
2g1n2
g1n2a1
2g1ŋ
g1ŋi1
g2o
go1e
1go1k
go1l2u1
go1l
g1o1m
1go1n
go2p1
2g2p2
g1q
g2r
gr2a1m1
g1r2a
g1ro
2gs
g2s1a
g2s1d
gs2d2a2
g2s2g
gs2j2
g2s2k
g2s2m
g2s2t
g2så
g1š
2g2t
g2t2m2
1gu
gu1li1
g2u1l
gu2l1l1
gu2m1u
gu1m
guo1s1
g2uo
gú1
2g1v
gw2h1
2g1x
gxt2
gy2
g1y1a
g2y1n
1gy1ö
2g1z
2gæ
1g2ö
1g2å
2g1åa
gåh1
gå2r1s1
2g2'
2g2`
2g2´
1ha
ha2b1s2
2h2a1d
h1a1f
h2a2j1
ha2k
h2a1m1
h1a1q
h2a1r
ha1r2a1
ha2r2i
1há
hán1
hb2
h1b1f2
2h1c
h2cn2
h1č
2h2d
hde1r1
h1d2e
h2d2n2
1h2e
he2i
h2ej1
he1n
he1r2i1
he1r
1hf
1hg1
h2g2i
h1h
1h2i
2h1i1b
hi1d1
hiel1
hi2e
h2ih
h1í
2h2j
h1k2a1
h1k2á1t1
h1ká
hkes1
h1k2e1
hke2t1
hk1k2a1
h2k1k
h1ko1
hko1n1
hko2p1
h2k1p2
h1k2å1
2hl
h1l2á
h1l2e2
hl2i1n1
h1li
2h1m
hmas1
h1m2a
2h1n2
h1n2o
h2np
1ho
hoe1
ho2k1
ho1n2
h1o2n1s2
ho2p1
h1ó
2hp
h1q
h1r2
2h1r2i
hro1
2h2s2
h2s1l
2ht
htes1
h1t2e
ht1t2a1
h2t1t
1ht2t2p
h1t2v1
1h2t´
h1þ
1hu
h2u1d1
2h1un
hu2p1
h2us
hu2s2e
hu2s1s
1hü
1hû
hv2
2h1w
h1x
hy1i
hym1
2h2z1
1hæ
1hä
hä2n1
1h1ø
h1öl2
h2öy
h1åd1
h2å2k1
hå2n1g1
2h'
2h`
2h´
2i1a
ia1h
ia2k
ia1s
i2a1t
i1á
i1b
1i2bn2
i2br2
1i2bs2
ib2ss1
i1b1æ
i2c
i1č
i1d
i2d2á
i1d2e1
i2di
id1j2a1
i2dj
i2d1l
1idpá
i2d1p2
1i2d2r2
i2dv2
i2då
i2e
1ie1di
i2ed1
ie1g1
iejv1
i2ej
ie2l2e
ie2li
ie2l1m
1ie2lv
ie2l2æ
ie2r1d1
ie1r
ie2r1k1
i2ev1
i1e2y
i1f
i1f2i1
i2f2j
i2f2r
i2få
i1g
i1g2a1
1i2g1n2
ig2o1r1
ig2o
i1gu1
2ih
i1ha1
ih1t2a1
i2ht
ih1t2i1
i2i
i2i2a
i2i1s
i2i1t
i1í
2i2j1
i1j2a
ij2a1d1
i1j2á
i1j2e
i1j2i
i2j1n2
i1j2o1
i1j2u
ij1æ
i1j2ä1
i1j2å
i1k
i1k2a1
i2k1á
i2kg
i2k2l2
i2k1m
i2k2r
ikro1
i2k1v
i1l
i2l2io
i1li
i2l2s
2im
i2m1a1b
i1m2a
i2m1ep
i1me
i2m1i2e
i1mi
i2m1l
i1m2o1
i2m1t
2i1n
i1n2a2
i2n1á
i2n1b2
in1di1
i2n1d
in1ek
i1n2e
i2nj
in2o1
in1o1s
i2n1p
i2n2æ
1iŋ
1io
i1o2a
i2o1l
i1o1m
io2n2æ
io1n
i1o1x
i1ó
i1p
i2pc
i2p1p1
1ip1sa
i2ps
1iq
1i2r1d
i1ro
i1r2u1
i2rå
i1s
2is.
i2s2a1g
i1sa
is2á1f
i1s2á
isá1h
i2s2áj1
isá1l
isá1s1
1i2sb
is2g2a
i2s1g
2i2s2j
is1k2a1
i2s1k
1i2s1l
i2s1m
is2me1
is1sa1
i2ss
is2s1l
is2s1r
i2sæ
i2s1å
1i2s2´
i1t
2i1t2e
i2t2j
i2t2s2
i2t2v
i2t1w
i1u2
i1v2a1
iv1o
1i2v1s
i2vu
1iw
i1ww
i1xa
i1y
2i2z
ize1
iz2h2e
i2zh2
i1æ
i1ä
2i1ö
2i2'
2i2`
2i2´
1í1s
1í1z
j2a
j1a2d1g
j2a1d
ja2k1
1ja2k1k
1ja2k1n
1ja2l1g
j2a1l
ja2l2l
j2a1r
1ja2rŋ
jas1
ja2s2o
j2at1
1ja1t2j
ja2u
1jay
1j2á
já2d1d1
j2á1d
j2ák1
já1r2i1
j2á1r
j1b1f2
1j2bj2
j1c2
j1č
2j1d
j2d2n2
j2d2o
jd2t2a
j2d1t
j2e
j1ei
1jek
je2k1t1
2j1e1m
j1e1n
je1p
je1r1
je1r2i1
je1s2j
1je2s1k
je1t
j1ex
j1f2
j1g
jge1
j1h
1jh.
j2ha
j1hk
1j2h'
j2i
j1i1b
1j2i1d1
1j2ih
ji1k1
1ji2k1k
1j1i1l
1ji1s
ji2u2
j1í
2j1j
j2k2a
jka2s1
j2ká
j2k1d2
j1ki2
j1k2l2
j1k2r
1j2k'
1j2k2´
j1l
jl2á1t1
jl2á
jl1la1
j2l1l
j2l2o
1j2l`
2j1m2
j2mi
jm1mu1
j2m1m
2j1n2
jnas1
j1n2a
j1ná1
j1n2o
1j2n1t
j2o
1jo2a
j1o1g
joh1
1jo2ki
jo1k
1joo
j1o1w
1jó
j1ò
j2p2
1j2pg2
j1q
j1r
1jr.
jr2a1l
j1r2a
2js2
j2sa
js2j2
j2ss2
j2s1t
j1s2u
j2s1uk1
2j1t2
j2t2a
j2t2i
j2t2v1s
j1t2v
j1þ
j2u
1ju.
j1u2a
ju1d1
1ju1d2a
ju2d2á
ju2d2u
2j2u1l
ju1li1
ju1mi1
ju1m
1juo1s
j2uo
j1ur
ju2r1d1
1ju2š
1jü
jva1s
j1v2a
j1v2i
j1vo
j1w
j1x
2jy
j2ys1
2j1z
j1æäl2
jæ2ä
1jæä2s2
1jä
j1ä2n2g1
jä2n
2j2ø2
jøf1
jøi1
jøk2
j2øn1
j2å
1jå1g
1jåh
j1åj
jå2t
1k2a
k2aa
ka2b1æ
k1a2d1d1
k2a1d
ka1l2e1
k2a1l
ka1n
ka1p1
2k2ar
ka2s
k2a1t
k1a2u
2ka1ö
1ká
1ká.
1ká1e
ká1h
1k2áj1
ká2j2á
ká1k1
1k2á1t
1ká1u
2kb
k2b2b
k2b1c
k1b2h1
k2b1j
kb1r2
k2b1s2
k1b1u
2k1c2
2kč
2k1ç
2k1d2
1k2e1
ke2s1b
ke2t
ke2v2á
k2ev
2k1f
k2fa
kf1i2e
k1f2i
k1g2o
k1g2r
2k1h
k2h2i
k2h2s2
1ki
2ki1d
k1iel
ki2e
kie1n
2k2ih
k2io
k1í
2k2j
k1j2a
k2j1n2
k1jæ
2k1k
kka1n1
k1k2a
k2k2ar1
kk2ej1
k1k2e1
k2k1n
k2k2s
k2kw
k2l2
kl2a1d1
k1la
k1l2e
2km
k2m2l
2k1n
1kn2ev
k1n2e
1ko
ko1as
ko2a
2ko1b
k2o1l
ko2li
ko2m1p1
ko1m
ko2n1t1
ko1n
k2o1t
k2o1u
2k1p2
k2q
k2r
1k1r2a
kr2a1d1
kra2k
k2r2d
1k2ro1m
k2rp
2k2ræ
1k1rå
2k1s
kse1n
k1s2e
k2s2g
k2s2n
k2s2t
k1sy1
k2sæ
2k2š1
2k1t
k2t1oc
k1t2o
1ku
k1u2e
ku1l2o1
k2u1l
2ku2v1l
2k1v
kva1a
k1v2a
k2v2d
k2v2i
kvi1k1
k2v1j
1k2v1m
kv2u1l1
k1vu
k2vå
1kvå1l
2kw
kw2h1
k1x
2k2y
k1y1l
2k1z
1kä
1k1ø
k1øl
1kö
1k2å
kå1d
kål2
kår1
k1å1s
2k'
2k`
2k2´
1la
2laa
la1mi1
l2a1m
la2m1j
l2an1
la2n1g1
la1p1
2l1a2p2`
2l1a1q
l2a1r1
la2s2j1
l2á
láb2
1l2áf
lá1la1
lá1r2i1
l2á1r
2l1b
l2b2d
l2b2y1
2lc
l1cd
l2cn2
l1c1p
2lč
l1ç
2l1d2
ld1d2a1
l2d1d
l2dv2
1l2e
l2e1d1
2leh
l2ei
le2n
l1e2ŋ
le1o1
le2p2a
le1s
le1t
l2eu1
l1é2l
1lé1r2
2lf
lf2a1s
l1fa
l2f1d
lf1g
l1f2å
2l1g
lg1gu1
l2g1g
lg2s2m1
l2gs
lg2u1t1
l1gu
2lh2
l2ha
l2ht
1li
l1i2ed1
li2e
l1iel
2l2ih
li2k1s1
li1k
2l1i1l
2l2io
li2p1
2l1iq
l2i1s2
li2ss1
l2iw
2l1í
2l1j
lj2e1
l2j1l
2l2k
lkes1
l1k2e1
lk1ki1
l2k1k
l1kä
2l1l
l2l2a1d
l1la
ll2a1n1
lla1s
ll2á1t1
ll2á
lle1s
l1l2e
llo1s1
l1l2o
llo1w1
ll1å1s
l1l2å
2lm
lm2k
lm1m2a1
l2m1m
l2m2s
lmå1s1
l1m2å
2l1n
l1n2e1
l2n2g
l2nr1
l2n2æ
1l2o
2loc
l1o1d
lo1e
l2o1f
l1oh
l1o1l
lon2o1
lo1n
l2ó
2lp
l2p2c
2l1q
lqu1
2l1r
l2r1p
2l1s
l2s2k
l2s1l
l2s2m
l2s1s2
l2s2t
l2s2u
l2s1æ
l2s1å
l1š
2l1t
l2t2á
l2t2h
l2t2i
lt1r2a1
l2t1r2
lt2ur1
l1tu
l1þ
1l2u
2l1ub
2l2u1f
lu2k1
lu2p1
2lus
2lv
l2v2k
l1vo
l1w
2l1x
2l2y2
2l1z
2l2æ
l1æä2n
læ2ä
1lä1
l1ø
l1ød
2l2ö
1l2å
l2åh
l1år
l1å1sa
lå1s
lå2t
2l'
2l`
2l´
2l1°
1m2a
2ma1b
